Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 6 Accounting

18-6-1.
Compensation and expenses of trustee.

Every trustee under any trust instrument, whether previously or subsequently made, shall be entitled to reasonable expenses and costs incurred in the execution of the trust, and also reasonable compensation for services rendered as trustee, which expenses, costs, and compensation may be charged annually or from time to time and may be equitably apportioned between principal and income in a manner that the trustee shall determine.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 26; P.L. 1956, ch. 3838, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-6-1

.

18-6-2.
Discharge of trustee by payment into court.

Whenever a trustee holds any sum of money, or any bond, note, or other obligation for money, or evidence of indebtedness, or any certificate of stock or other chose in action, payable or deliverable to, or the property of, another, and the person entitled to it cannot, for any reason, give proper receipt or discharge for it, and the trustee holding the money or property desires to free himself or herself from further liability for it, the trustee may pay or deliver the money or property into the registry of the superior court, presenting with it his or her petition praying to be discharged, and setting out, under oath, to the best of the knowledge, information, and belief of the affiant, the circumstances under which the trustee holds the money or property, and how the other person or persons is or are entitled to it, and why the trustee or they cannot give proper receipt or discharge for the money or property; and upon the filing of the petition, notice of it shall be given in the manner that the court shall direct.

The court shall take any proceedings in respect of the money or property that it deems best.

The costs and expenses, including expenses and counsel fees of the trustee, as between solicitor and client, as allowed by the court or by one of the justices of the court, shall be paid or retained accordingly out of the money or property.

When any person entitled to the money or property paid or deposited in the registry appears and satisfies the court as to his or her right to the money or property, it shall be paid or delivered over to that person as the court shall direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 23; C.P.A. 1905, § 1147; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

18-6-2

.

18-6-3.
Application for allowance of accounts.

A trustee may apply to the superior court for the allowance of his or her account or accounts.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 25; P.L. 1942, ch. 1144, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-6-3

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 82, § 1.

18-6-4.
Notice — Guardian ad litem.

Upon the application, notice in any form that the court may order shall be given by delivering or mailing by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the notice to the attorney general if there are public charitable interests, and to all persons to or for whom income has been paid or accumulated during the period covered by the account, and to those persons who, during that period, have received or were entitled to receive or in the discretion of the trustee might have received principal, and to all persons who, at the time of the mailing or delivery of the copy of the notice, in default of any appointment or otherwise, would be entitled to share in the income or principal if an existing tenancy for life or for years had then terminated or the trust estate were then distributable in whole or in part, and to the executor or administrator of any deceased persons entitled to notice or to those in being who have succeeded to the interest of the deceased person, and to other persons who are or may become interested and who shall have filed with the accountant a request in writing for notice of proceedings on accounts, and any additional notice that the court may order shall be given by publication, unless all persons interested receive actual notice.

The written assent to an account, or the waiver in writing of notice of it by a person interested or by his or her guardian or legal representative, shall be deemed equivalent to notice.

If there are other persons interested to whom notice has not been given by delivery of registered or certified mail, or if the interests of persons unborn, unascertained, or legally incompetent to act in their own behalf are not represented except by the accountant, the court shall appoint as guardian ad litem a competent and disinterested person to represent these interests and persons, and the guardian ad litem shall, without further notice or action by the court, also represent with respect to the account all interested persons who may be born after the date of his or her appointment.

It shall not be necessary, unless the court orders, to designate by name persons represented by the guardian ad litem, other than those who are entitled to notice by delivery of registered or certified mailing.

The guardian ad litem appointed by the court shall be entitled to any reasonable compensation that the court shall allow, which shall be charged to income and/or principal as the court directs.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 25; P.L. 1942, ch. 1144, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-6-4

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 266, § 1.

18-6-5.
Notice to minor under age of fourteen (14) years.

In the case of a minor entitled to notice by delivery or mailing under this chapter, who is under the age of fourteen (14) at the date of the notice, the copy of the notice may be delivered or mailed to the legal or natural guardian of the minor, or if the court directs, to some other person in his or her behalf.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 266, § 1.

18-6-6.
Allowance or disallowance of accounts.

Upon the hearing, the court may allow or disallow the account or accounts in whole or in part and may make any orders and decrees in relation to the account or accounts that justice may require, and after a final decree has been entered on any account under this section, it shall not be impeached except for fraud or manifest error.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 25; P.L. 1942, ch. 1144, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-6-6

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 82, § 1.

18-6-7.
Account of common trust fund.

In any proceeding for the allowance of an account of a common trust fund, the provisions of §§

18-6-4

and

18-6-5

, as to the persons entitled to and the manner of giving notice, shall apply as if the account was an account for each of the participating trusts in the common trust fund.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 82, § 1.